Connecticut, session 2026, HB05206.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to establish a tax
credit of not greater than two thousand five hundred dollars against the
personal income tax for volunteer firefighters who meet certain service
requirements, as certified by such volunteer firefighters' fire chief.